District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.16

Voting.

(a)

Each director shall have one vote for purposes of decisions made by the board of directors.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, the affirmative vote of a majority of directors present at a meeting shall be required for action by the board of directors.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 816 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition